Massachusetts, session 194th, H4122.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 249. (a) As used in this section, the following term shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meaning:
“Emergency contraceptive”, any drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration as a contraceptive method for use after sexual intercourse, whether provided
over-the-counter or by prescription.
(b) A person shall be deemed to have committed an unfair or deceptive act under chapter
93A if the person makes or disseminates to the public or causes to be made or disseminated to
the public any advertisement that indicates that the person provides abortions or emergency
contraceptives, or referrals for abortions or emergency contraceptives, when the person knows or
of 2

reasonably should have known, at the time of publication or dissemination to the public of the
advertisement, that the person does not provide abortions or emergency contraceptives.
SECTION 2. Chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 12L the following section:-
Section 12L½. (a) As used in this section, the following terms shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
''Medication abortion'', abortion provided by medication techniques.
“Medication abortion reversal”, administering, dispensing, distributing or delivering a
drug with the intent to interfere with, reverse or halt a medication abortion.
(b) A person licensed pursuant to this chapter shall not provide, prescribe, administer or
attempt medication abortion reversal.
(c) A person who violates this section shall be subject to disciplinary procedures by their
licensing board.
of 2